Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 5. Protective Associations.

§ 69-29-201.
Purposes, organization, powers and duties.

For the purpose of encouraging the production of more and better livestock and poultry in this state, and for the purpose of preventing theft of livestock and poultry by posting cash rewards for the arrest and conviction of livestock and poultry thieves, and requesting the Governor to aid by posting rewards and employing detectives for this purpose, all owners of livestock and poultry and land owners in any county are hereby authorized and encouraged to organize a county livestock and poultry owners protective association, hereinafter referred to as the association. All persons owning land in the county and all persons owning any livestock or poultry in the county are eligible to membership in the association. They shall organize by meeting at the county courthouse, by electing a president of the association and a secretary, and a treasurer, who shall each agree to serve for one year, without pay, when their successors shall be elected. There shall be a board of directors, not to exceed three members from each beat in the county, elected at the same time and in the same manner as the other officers. No legal charter of incorporation shall be necessary. Each county association shall have authority to make and publish its own by-laws and fix the amount of annual dues. The association, being purely voluntary, may disband or continue to function, as the members shall determine. Any association already organized in any county shall be deemed to be lawfully organized for the purpose of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4908; Laws, 1940, ch. 209; Laws, 1942, ch. 259.

§ 69-29-203.
Assistance to sheriff in apprehending thieves; reward.

When the theft of any livestock or poultry shall be reported to the sheriff of the county where the theft occurred, it shall be the duty of the sheriff to make prompt and diligent effort to arrest the thief or thieves. At the same time, it shall be the duty of the president of the association to assist the sheriff in the capture of the thief or thieves by posting or publishing the standing reward offered by the association for information leading to arrest and conviction of the said thief or thieves, but in case of a theft of poultry no such reward shall be offered by the association where the value of the poultry stolen would amount to a misdemeanor only. When additional assistance may be needed to bring those guilty of the theft of any livestock or poultry to justice, the president of the association, or in his absence or disability, three or more directors of the association may, in their discretion, notify the Governor and request his assistance. When the Governor shall receive such request it shall then be his duty to offer such reward as he may deem proper for arrest and conviction of the said thief or thieves, or for information leading to the arrest and conviction, but such reward shall not exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) in any particular case. In case it is impossible to break up livestock and poultry thefts without employment of detectives, then the Governor may, in his discretion, employ a reliable detective to assist the sheriff and the association in any county. The reward to be offered by the Governor and the expense of detectives shall be paid out of the Governor’s contingent fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4909; Laws, 1940, ch. 209; Laws, 1942, ch. 259.

§ 69-29-205.
Reports.

It shall be the duty of the secretary of each county association to file annually with the Governor a report, countersigned by the president and treasurer of the association, showing the names of all officers and directors, the number of members, the amount of dues collected, the amount paid by the association in rewards, the number of arrests and convictions, the number of thefts of livestock and poultry, and the number stolen and recovered. It shall be the duty of the Governor to report to the Legislature in detail his expenditures from contingent fund, in an itemized statement, and he shall have on file in his office for the information of members of the Legislature the information furnished by the various county associations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4910; Laws, 1940, ch. 209; Laws, 1942, ch. 259.